District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-211

Department of School Attendance and Work Permits — Creation.

Repealed.

Feb. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 807, ch. 140, Art. III, § 1
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-247, § 2(b), 38 DCR 376

History

2001 Ed., § 38-207.
1981 Ed., § 31-411.
1973 Ed., § 31-211.

Prior Codifications